Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1503
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Petroleum Release Remedial Action Act, the definitions found in sections 66-1504 to 66-1515.01 shall be used.

Laws 1989, LB 289, § 3;

Laws 1991, LB 409, § 2;

Laws 1994, LB 1160, § 117.